Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Brokers, §§ 13, 21 et seq.

12 C.J.S., Brokers, §§ 6-24.

Sec. 08.88.161.
License required.

Unless licensed as a real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or real estate salesperson in this state, a person may not, except as otherwise provided in this chapter,

sell, exchange, rent, lease, auction, or purchase real estate;

list real estate for sale, exchange, rent, lease, auction, or purchase;

collect rent for the use of real estate or collect fees for property management;

practice, or negotiate for a contract to practice, property management;

collect fees for community association management;

practice, or negotiate for a contract to practice, community association management;

as a business, buy, sell, or deal in

options in real estate; or

options in improvements to real estate;

assist in or direct the procuring of prospective buyers and sellers of real estate, communicate with prospective buyers and sellers of real estate, or assist in the negotiation of a transaction that results or is calculated to result in the sale, exchange, rent, lease, auction, or purchase of real estate;

accept or pay a fee for the performance of any of the activities listed in this section except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter;

hold out to the public as being engaged in the business of doing any of the things listed in this section; or

attempt or offer to do any of the things listed in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 8 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legality of activities under AS 18.80 in aid of housing for minority groups, see AS

18.80.215

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

Sec. 08.88.165.
Conduct of auctions.

Notwithstanding AS

08.88.161

, a person who is not licensed under this chapter may conduct an auction of real estate if

the person has completed an auctioneering program at a school certified by an agency of this or another state, and the program included a course on real estate sales; and

a real estate broker licensed under this chapter or an associate real estate broker licensed under this chapter supervises and is present during the auction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.88.167.
Civil penalty for unlicensed or unauthorized practice.

In addition to penalties prescribed by any other provision of law, if a person engages or offers to engage in an activity for which a license is required under AS

08.88.161

without being licensed or authorized to engage in the activity in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the commission may enter an order levying a civil penalty.

A civil penalty levied under this section may not exceed $5,000, or the amount of gain realized plus $5,000, whichever is greater, for each offense. In levying a civil penalty, the commission shall set the amount of the penalty imposed under this section after taking into account the seriousness of the violation, the economic benefit resulting from the violation, the history of violations, and other facts the commission considers relevant.

Before entering an order under (a) of this section, the commission shall send the person written notice of the proposed order that grants the person a 30-day period during which the person may request a hearing on the record.

In connection with proceedings under (a) — (c) of this section, the commission may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the disclosure of evidence and may request the department to bring an action to enforce a subpoena.

A person aggrieved by the levy of a civil penalty under this section may file an appeal with the superior court for judicial review of the penalty under AS

44.62.560

.

If a person fails to pay a civil penalty within 30 days after entry of an order under (a) of this section, or within 10 days after the court enters a final judgment in favor of the commission of an order stayed pending an appeal under (e) of this section, the commission may initiate other action to recover the amount of the penalty.

An action to enforce an order under this section may be combined with an action for an injunction under AS

08.88.037

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.88.170.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.171.
Eligibility for license.

A natural person qualifies for a real estate broker license if the person passes the brokers examination, applies for a license within six months after passing the examination, furnishes satisfactory proof of successful completion of the education requirements of AS

08.88.091

, has had at least 36 months of active and continuous experience as a real estate licensee within the 60 months immediately preceding application for the broker license, is not under indictment for or seven years have elapsed since the person has completed a sentence imposed upon conviction of a felony or other crime that, in the judgment of the commission, affects the person’s ability to practice as a real estate broker competently and safely or upon conviction of forgery, theft, extortion, conspiracy to defraud creditors, or fraud, and is an owner of a real estate business or employed as a real estate broker by a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company. Unless the broker fails to satisfy the educational requirements of AS

08.88.095

or renew the license, or the broker’s license is suspended or revoked, the broker’s license continues in effect as long as the broker’s license is active. If the broker stops being an owner of a real estate business or stops being employed as a real estate broker by a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company, the broker’s license is suspended from the time the broker stops until the broker satisfies the educational requirements of AS

08.88.098

and

again becomes an owner of a real estate business or is again employed as a real estate broker by a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company; or

is employed by another broker as an associate broker, in which case the real estate broker license shall be returned to the commission by the broker, and the commission shall issue the broker an associate real estate broker license.

A natural person qualifies for an associate real estate broker license if the person passes the brokers examination, applies for the license within six months after passing the examination, submits satisfactory proof of successful completion of the education requirements of AS

08.88.091

, has had at least 36 months of active and continuous experience as a real estate licensee within the 60 months immediately preceding application for the license, furnishes satisfactory proof that errors and omissions insurance required under AS

08.88.172

has been obtained, is not under indictment for or seven years have elapsed since the person has completed a sentence imposed upon conviction of a felony or other crime that, in the judgment of the commission, affects the person’s ability to practice as an associate real estate broker competently and safely or upon conviction of forgery, theft, extortion, conspiracy to defraud creditors, or fraud, and is employed by a licensed real estate broker as an associate real estate broker. Unless the associate broker fails to satisfy the educational requirements of AS

08.88.095

or renew the license, or the associate broker’s license is suspended or revoked, the associate broker’s license continues in effect as long as the associate broker is employed by a licensed real estate broker as an associate broker. If the associate broker stops being employed by a licensed real estate broker, the associate broker’s license is suspended from the time the associate broker stops until the associate broker satisfies the educational requirements of AS

08.88.098

and

again is employed by a real estate broker as an associate broker; or

becomes an owner of a real estate business or is employed as a real estate broker by a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company, in which case the associate broker’s license shall be returned to the commission by the associate broker, and the commission shall issue the licensee a broker’s license.

A natural person qualifies for a real estate salesperson license if the person passes the real estate salesperson examination, applies for the license within six months after passing the examination, submits satisfactory proof of successful completion of the education requirements of AS

08.88.091

, is at least 19 years of age, furnishes satisfactory proof that errors and omissions insurance required under AS

08.88.172

has been obtained, is not under indictment for a felony or other crime that, in the judgment of the commission, affects the individual’s ability to practice as a real estate salesperson competently and safely or under indictment for forgery, theft, extortion, conspiracy to defraud creditors, or fraud, or, if convicted of such an offense, seven years have elapsed since the person completed the sentence imposed upon conviction. Unless the salesperson fails to satisfy the educational requirements of AS

08.88.095

or renew the license, or the real estate salesperson’s license is suspended or revoked, a real estate salesperson’s license continues in effect.

A real estate licensee shall promptly inform the commission of a change in business association that affects the status of the licensee’s license under this section.

Notwithstanding (a) — (d) of this section, a natural person qualifies for a limited license to practice community association management under (f) of this section if the person

applies by January 1, 1999;

pays the required fees;

demonstrates to the commission’s satisfaction that the person has engaged in the practice of community association management for at least 24 months before January 1, 1999; and

meets other requirements that may be established by the commission in its regulations for issuance of a license under this subsection.

A person who qualifies under (e) of this section shall be issued an associate broker license if, at the time of issuance, the person is employed by a broker. A person who qualifies under (e) of this section shall be issued a broker license if, at the time of issuance, the person is the owner of a community association management business or is employed as a community association manager by a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company. After initial issuance of a license to a person under this subsection, the person is subject to the same requirements that exist for other brokers and associate brokers licensed under this chapter. However, notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, under a license issued under this subsection, a person may practice only community association management and does not qualify as a broker or associate broker for purposes of AS

08.88.161

(1) — (4), (7), or (8) or

08.88.165

(2). A person issued a limited license to practice community association management under this section may not use the terms “salesperson,” “broker,” or “associate broker” for any business purpose unless the person is also licensed appropriately under other provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1969; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 28 SLA 1974; am §§ 12 — 15 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 67 SLA 1983; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 105 SLA 1990; am §§ 10, 11 ch 45 SLA 1998; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 74 SLA 2005; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 51 SLA 2007; am §§ 3, 4 ch 113 SLA 2008; am §§ 2, 3 ch 39 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, see 12 AAC 64, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (a) and (b), substituted “36 months” for “24 months” and “60 months” for “36 months”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 5(b), ch. 39, SLA 2016, the 2016 amendments to subsections (a) and (b), effective on January 1, 2018, “apply to applications for a real estate broker license under AS

08.88.171(a)

or (b) or

08.88.241(b)

submitted on or after January 1, 2018.”

Sec. 08.88.172.
Errors and omissions insurance.

A person licensed as a real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or real estate salesperson shall, as a condition of licensing, carry and maintain errors and omissions insurance to cover activities for which licensing is required under AS

08.88.161

.

The department shall establish by regulation the terms and conditions of the errors and omissions insurance required by this section, including

coverage requirements;

limits of coverage;

the maximum amount of premium to be charged licensees under a master errors and omissions policy under (d) of this section; and

the method for adjusting these amounts based on the Consumer Price Index.

A licensee may obtain the errors and omissions insurance required by (a) of this section by

obtaining a master insurance policy that may be made available to licensees by the commission; or

independently obtaining errors and omissions insurance that complies with the requirements established under (b) of this section.

The commission may

solicit bids for a master errors and omissions insurance policy for licensees that meets the minimum terms and conditions established under (b) of this section using a competitive sealed bid process under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code); and

charge a licensee a reasonable administration fee to recover costs incurred in connection with the solicitation made under (1) of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 39 SLA 2016.]

A licensee seeking to obtain or renew a license shall certify to the commission that errors and omissions insurance has been obtained. A licensee who elects to independently obtain errors and omissions insurance shall provide a certificate of coverage with the application to obtain or renew a license.

History.

(§ 5 ch 113 SLA 2008; am § 4 ch 39 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, repealed (e).

Sec. 08.88.173.
Fidelity bond for community association managers.

If the board of directors of a community association allows a broker to exercise control over community association fees or other community association funds, the broker must provide evidence to the commission that the broker is covered by a blanket fidelity insurance bond. The bond may be in the name of the broker with the association as an additional insured or in the name of the association with the broker as an additional insured. The bond must cover the maximum funds that will be within the control of the community association manager at any time while the bond is in force. The commission may grant an exemption from the bonding requirement of this subsection if the commission determines that the community association manager has equivalent comparable coverage or that coverage is unavailable. The commission may adopt regulations to implement this subsection, including regulations concerning the minimum coverage and terms of coverage that are required and proof of bond and the granting of exemptions.

If a loss covered by the fidelity bond required under this section is also reimbursable from the real estate recovery fund, the owners’ association that suffered the loss may not recover under the bond until the association has obtained a final judgment, final arbitration award, or settlement agreement and filed a claim for an award under AS

08.88.460

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 113 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.88.175.
Limitations on community association managers.

A licensee may not, within the practice of community association management, exercise control over the

reserves or investment accounts of a community association;

operating account of a community association unless

allowed under a contract that has been approved by the association’s board of directors; and

duplicate financial statements concerning the account are sent by the institution holding the account to the licensee and the association’s board of directors at separate addresses.

History.

(§ 12 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.88.180.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.181.
Content and purpose of examination.

The real estate examinations may include questions on real estate business ethics and standards; arithmetic and accounting; elementary principles of land economics and appraisal; the general principles in state statutes relating to deeds, mortgages, real estate contracts, subdivisions, common interest communities, legal descriptions, building restrictions, real estate licensee relationships, agency law, brokerage, disclosure requirements, trust accounting requirements, and landlord and tenant law; property management ethics and standards; community association management operations, ethics, and standards; and the general provisions of this chapter and of the regulations of the commission.

The real estate salesperson examination covers the same subjects as the real estate broker examination, but is less difficult.

The only purpose of an examination under this chapter is to disqualify those whose lack of ability to participate in real estate transactions would create a serious risk of serious financial loss to members of the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1969; am § 16 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, “salesman” was changed to “salesperson” in subsection (b) pursuant to § 58, ch. 45, SLA 1998.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

Sec. 08.88.190.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.191.
Administration of examination.

The commission shall offer written examinations at periodic intervals but at least once a year.

If the commission authorizes the department to contract with a national testing service to prepare, administer, and grade examinations,

the commission or its designee shall review the examination and approve its contents;

application for an examination may be transmitted by the applicant directly to the national testing service; payment of an examination fee shall be made by the applicant directly to the national testing service’s designated representative before the examination is taken by the applicant.

An applicant who fails the written examination may request that the examination be reevaluated. The commission shall provide by regulation for a system of reevaluating examinations on request of an applicant who fails the examination. The system provided by the commission may provide for reevaluation by the testing service or by any other person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 108 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 24 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 17 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, see 12 AAC 64, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

Sec. 08.88.200.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.201.
Reexamination.

A person who fails an examination may apply for a subsequent examination, but shall pay the application fee with each application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 32 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.88.210.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.211.
Qualification for examination. [Repealed, § 42 ch 167 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.88.171.]

Sec. 08.88.220.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.221.
Fees.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for a real estate broker, associate broker, or salesperson licensee or applicant for the following:

examination;

initial license;

renewal of an active license;

renewal of an inactive license;

amending or transferring a license;

publications offered by the commission;

seminars offered by the commission;

reinstatement of a lapsed license;

changes to registered office information;

course certification and recertification;

instructor approval and renewal of approval; and

issuance of a new license document under AS

08.88.095(d)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1968; am §§ 12, 13 ch 28 SLA 1974; am §§ 18, 19 ch 167 SLA 1980; am §§ 3, 4, 7 ch 96 SLA 1982; am § 50 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 74 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For provisions prescribing the applicability of the 2005 addition of paragraph (12) to initial licenses, licenses issued after revocation, and suspended licenses, for action on the license occurring on or after January 1, 2006, see § 14, ch. 74, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.88.230.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.231.
Deposit in general fund. [Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 08.88.240.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.241.
Reinstatement of lapsed license.

A person whose real estate license has lapsed less than 24 months is eligible for reinstatement of the license if the person provides the required application, license fees, proof of continuing education as required by AS

08.88.091

for licensing periods during which the license was inactive or lapsed, proof of completion of the educational requirements under AS

08.88.095(a)

, if applicable, and any fee required under AS

08.88.221

(12).

A real estate licensee whose license has been lapsed for more than 24 months is not eligible for reinstatement of the license and is eligible for the license only by meeting the qualifications applicable to initial licensure under AS

08.88.171

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 5 ch 130 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 31 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 94 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 108 SLA 1970; am § 21 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 74 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.88.250.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.251.
Inactive license.

A real estate licensee who intends to become inactive shall return to the commission the person’s license certificate and a completed inactivation form provided by the commission along with any applicable fees. The commission shall issue the person an inactive license certificate. A real estate licensee whose license lapses under AS

08.88.095(e)

is not eligible for an inactive license under this subsection unless the license is reinstated under AS

08.88.241

.

An inactive licensee may not attempt or offer to do any of the activities listed in AS

08.88.161

, but may receive commissions or other payments from the broker who previously contracted with or employed the licensee for services performed while actively licensed.

A person who has an inactive license certificate under (a) of this section may reactivate the license by applying for an active license and paying the required fees. A person is eligible for change from an inactive to an active status under this subsection only if the person has been in inactive status for less than 24 months. If the person has been in inactive status for 24 months or for more than 24 months, the person is required to meet the requirements for initial licensure in order to be licensed under this chapter again.

A licensee may, subject to the approval of the commission, renew an inactive license for 24 months from the anniversary date of the issuance of the initial inactive license certificate under (a) of this section.

An active license that has been converted from inactive status under (c) of this section shall be issued for the remainder of the current 24-month period of the inactive license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 4 ch 31 SLA 1968; am § 7 ch 108 SLA 1970; am §§ 22 — 24 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 105 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 106 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 74 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

Sec. 08.88.260.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.261.
Out-of-state licenses. [Repealed, § 7 ch 105 SLA 1990.]